Utah statutes.
4-1-8.   General definitions.

Subject to additional definitions contained in the chapters of this title which are applicable to specific chapters, as used in this title:

(1)  "Agriculture" means the science and art of the production of plants and animals useful to man including the preparation of plants and animals for human use and disposal by marketing or otherwise.

(2)  "Agricultural product" or "product of agriculture" means any product which is derived from agriculture, including any product derived from aquaculture as defined in Section 4-37-103.

(3)  "Commissioner" means the commissioner of agriculture and food.

(4)  "Department" means the Department of Agriculture and Food created in Chapter 2, Department - State Chemist - Enforcement.

(5)  "Dietary supplement" has the meaning defined in the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.

(6)  "Livestock" means cattle, sheep, goats, swine, horses, mules, poultry, domesticated elk as defined in Section 4-39-102, or any other domestic animal or domestic furbearer raised or kept for profit.

(7)  "Organization" means a corporation, government or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, two or more persons having a joint or common interest, or any other legal entity.

(8)  "Person" means a natural person or individual, corporation, organization, or other legal entity.

